Massachusetts, session 194th, S769.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Concurrent review” the 
following definition:- 
“Continuing course of treatment”, having at least 1 visit in the past 4 months for the same 
or similar mental health diagnosis or set of symptoms. 
SECTION 2. Subsection (e) of section 15 of said chapter 176O is hereby amended by 
striking out the words “that could have been imposed if the provider had not been disenrolled;” 
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- permitted under this section;. 
SECTION 3. The second sentence of said subsection (e) of said section 15 of said chapter 
176O is hereby further amended by striking out the word “remained” and inserting in place 
thereof the following words:- had been. 

of 3 12  SECTION 4. Section 15 of said chapter 176O is hereby further amended by adding after 
subsection (k) the following subsection:- 
(l) A carrier shall allow any insured who is engaged in a continuing course of treatment 
with a licensed mental health provider eligible for coverage under the plan, and whose provider 
in connection with said mental health treatment is involuntarily or voluntarily disenrolled, other 
than for quality-related reasons or for fraud, or whose carrier has changed for any reason thereby 
placing the provider out-of-network, to continue treatment with said provider through an out-of-
network option, pursuant to the following: 
(1) The carrier shall reimburse the licensed mental health care professional the usual 
network per-unit reimbursement rate for the relevant service and provider type as payment in 
full. If more than one reimbursement rate exists, the carrier shall use the median reimbursement 
rate. 
(2) The non-network option may require that a covered person pay a higher co-payment 
only if the higher co-payment results from increased costs caused by the use of a non-network 
provider. The carrier shall provide an actuarial demonstration of the increased costs to the 
division of health care finance and policy at the commissioner’s request. If the increased costs 
are not justified, the commissioner shall require the carrier to recalculate the appropriate costs 
allowed and resubmit the appropriate co-payment to the division of health care finance and 
policy. 
(3) No additional charges, costs or deductibles may be levied due to the exercise of the 
out-of-network option. The amount of any additional co-payment charged by the carrier for the 
additional cost of the creation and maintenance of coverage described in subsection (1) shall be 

of 3 34 paid by the covered person unless it is paid by an employer or other person through agreement 
with the carrier.